Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 6. Municipal Participation.

Sec. 43.82.500.
Obligation to share payments with municipalities.

If the commissioner develops a contract under AS

43.82.020

that includes terms that exempt a party to the contract, and the property, gas, products, and activities associated with the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract, from a municipal tax or assessment in accordance with AS

29.45.810

or AS

29.46.010(b)

, or AS

43.82.200

and

43.82.210

, the commissioner shall include a term in the contract that the party pay a portion of the periodic payments due under the contract to the revenue-affected municipality.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.505.
Payments to economically affected municipalities.

If the commissioner executes a contract under AS

43.82.020

that will produce one or more economically affected municipalities, the commissioner shall include a term in the contract that provides for a portion of the periodic payments to the economically affected municipalities under the principles in AS

43.82.520

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.510.
Municipal advisory group.

If the commissioner approves an application and proposed project plan under AS

43.82.140

and decides to develop a contract under AS

43.82.020

and

43.82.200

, the commissioner shall notify each revenue-affected municipality and economically affected municipality.

The mayor of a municipality notified by the commissioner under (a) of this section may appoint one representative to a municipal advisory group in relation to the application.

Each municipal advisory group serves until a final action is taken on the application for which the group was appointed.

Each municipal advisory group shall elect a chair.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.520.
Duties of the commissioner of revenue in relation to municipal participation.

The commissioner shall meet with each municipal advisory group periodically to report on the development of the contract provisions that affect the municipalities.

In developing a contract under AS

43.82.200

—

43.82.270

, the commissioner shall ensure that each revenue-affected municipality and economically affected municipality receives a fair and reasonable share of the payments provided under AS

43.82.210

in accordance with the following principles:

the share of the payments to revenue-affected municipalities should be given priority over payments to economically affected municipalities with due regard to the anticipated size of the tax base that the contract would exempt from municipal taxation by revenue-affected municipalities;

the share of the payments to municipalities should be determined with due regard to the anticipated economic and social burdens that would be imposed on the municipality by construction and operation of the project;

the respective shares of the total payments to the state and to municipalities should be fixed in a manner to ensure that their respective interests are aligned;

to the extent practicable, the periodic amounts paid to each of the municipalities should be stable and predictable; and

to the extent practicable, the provisions for sharing payments with municipalities should be consistent with the principles established in AS

43.82.210

(b).

In establishing the municipal shares under (b) of this section, the commissioner shall consult with the pertinent municipal advisory group.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)